Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 20 Costs

12-20-1, 12-20-2.
Repealed.

12-20-3.
Sheriff’s fees on commitments and habeas corpus.

All commitments upon process issued in criminal cases by the supreme court, the superior court within and for the counties of Providence and Newport, and the district court for the second and sixth divisions shall be made by deputy sheriffs attending upon the courts respectively, and all writs of habeas corpus issued by the supreme court, the superior court within and for the counties of Providence and Newport, and the district court for the second and sixth divisions shall be served by deputy sheriffs attending upon the courts respectively, and the deputy sheriffs shall receive no fees for making the commitments or for serving the writs, but shall receive their actual expenses of travel, to be allowed by the court, and which shall not form a part of the bill of costs taxed against a convict under §

12-20-9

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 11; P.L. 1926, ch. 799, § 1; P.L. 1927, ch. 1036, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

12-30-3

; P.L. 1966, ch. 209, § 2; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 27.

12-20-4.
Sheriff’s fees on scire facias.

The fees chargeable by deputy sheriffs for serving writs and executions in scire facias against bail in criminal cases shall be the same as provided for similar service of writs and executions in civil cases.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 12; P.L. 1897, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1898, ch. 578, § 1; P.L. 1900, ch. 714, § 1; P.L. 1901, ch. 831, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1200; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 11; P.L. 1918, ch. 1648, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

12-20-4

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 46.

12-20-5.
Allowance for service of precept.

Any officer charged with the service of any precept in any criminal case, either original, intermediate, or final, shall be allowed by the court out of which the precept is issued, in a sum that the court may deem just and reasonable for the actual and necessary expense incurred by him or her in serving it, and which shall not form a part of the bill of costs taxed against a convict under §

12-20-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1907, ch. 1443, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 11; P.L. 1918, ch. 1648, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

12-20-5

; P.L. 1966, ch. 209, § 2.

12-20-6.
Fees of city and town police departments and state agencies.

For each criminal complaint filed in the district court by a city or town police department, the state police, or a state agency, the clerk of the district court shall assess against the defendant and remit to the city or town or the state the sum of three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50), to be taxed as costs against the defendant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 12; P.L. 1897, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1898, ch. 578, § 1; P.L. 1900, ch. 714, § 1; P.L. 1901, ch. 831, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1200; P.L. 1908, ch. 1580, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 11; P.L. 1918, ch. 1648, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-20-6

; P.L. 1960, ch. 72, § 2; P.L. 1961, ch. 89, § 5; P.L. 1980, ch. 397, §§ 1, 2.

12-20-7.
Witness fees.

The fees of witnesses shall be:

For every day’s attendance before the supreme or superior court, or before any other tribunal or magistrate, including attendance in giving depositions, except that no officer or other employee of the state or of any city or town shall be entitled to receive a fee for attendance if he or she attends during his or her regular hours of employment for which he or she is entitled to receive his or her ordinary salary or if he or she appears outside his or her regular hours of employment and is entitled to receive additional compensation from his or her employer for attendance: $ 10.00

For every mile’s travel: $ 0.10

For every day’s commitment in jail upon default to enter into recognizance with surety: $ 2.00

For any witness who shall come from without the jurisdiction of the state to testify in behalf of the state, in any criminal proceedings, any sum, in addition to this travel and attendance, that the court before which the proceedings are had shall deem proper.

In addition to the fees provided in subsection (a) of this section, witnesses summoned and testifying as experts in behalf of the state, or any person acting as an interpreter, before the supreme, superior, or district court, may be allowed and paid any sum that the court may deem just and reasonable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 10; C.P.A. 1905, § 1199; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 10; P.L. 1939, ch. 715, § 7; P.L. 1956, ch. 3624, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-20-7

; P.L. 1974, ch. 153, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 182, § 1.

12-20-8.
Payment of costs where defendant committed to correctional institutions.

The costs of prosecution and conviction of persons imprisoned in the adult correctional institutions shall be paid by the state, and the payment of those costs shall form no part of the sentence of convicts. Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to prevent the imposition of costs provided for in chapter 25 of this title. The cost of commitment shall be paid by the state except as otherwise provided by the general laws; provided, that persons imprisoned in the adult correctional institutions shall be responsible for any assessments made pursuant to §

23-1-3

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 58; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 58; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 52; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 52; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 52; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-20-8

; P.L. 1980, ch. 116, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 589, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 94, § 3.

12-20-9.
Costs as to other defendants.

The payment of costs shall, in all other cases, be a part of the sentence of a convict who shall be sentenced to be imprisoned until the costs are paid or remitted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 59; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 59; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 53; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 53; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 53; G.L. 1956, §

12-20-9

.

12-20-10.
Remission of costs — Indigency — Limited ability to pay — Inherent power — Prohibition against remitting order of restitution.

The payment of court costs, assessments, and fees in criminal cases shall, upon application or sworn testimony, presented during sentencing or any time thereafter, be remitted in whole based on a determination that a defendant is indigent pursuant to the standards set forth in this section.

Qualification for and/or receipt of any of the following benefits or services by the defendant shall be prima facie evidence of the defendant’s indigency:

Temporary assistance to needy families;

Social security including supplemental security income and state supplemental payments program;

Public assistance;

Disability insurance; or

Food stamps.

The superior and district courts may establish additional criteria and/or procedures for the determination of an ability to pay and for the administration of this section.

If a defendant is not indigent, the payment of court costs, assessments, and fees in criminal cases may, upon sworn testimony or application during sentencing or any time thereafter, be remitted in whole or in part by any justice of the superior or district court or the justice’s designee pursuant to a determination of limited or inability to pay based upon the standards set forth in this section, or any other considerations the court may deem appropriate. Provided further that any judge of a district court may remit the court costs, assessments, and fees in criminal case(s) pending in his or her court, or in the case of any prisoner sentenced by the court, where no appeal of the sentence has been taken.

In making its assessment of a defendant’s limited or inability to pay, the court may consider the defendant’s good faith efforts to pay, and/or his or her outstanding court orders for payments in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or more for any of the following:

Restitution payments to the victims of crime;

Child support payments;

Payments for any counseling required as a condition of the sentence imposed including, but not limited to, substance abuse, mental health, and domestic violence; or

Fines imposed as part of the sentence.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall not limit the court’s inherent power to remit any fine, court costs, fees, assessments, or other costs of prosecution, provided no order of restitution shall be suspended by the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 60; P.L. 1898, ch. 588, § 1; P.L. 1905, ch. 1241, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1223; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 60; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 54; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 54; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 54; G.L. 1956, §

12-20-10

; P.L. 2008, ch. 297, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 326, § 4; P.L. 2022, ch. 200, § 2, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 201, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

12-20-11.
Apportionment of costs among defendants.

Whenever more than one defendant in the same process shall be convicted and sentenced to fine or imprisonment in jail, the court pronouncing sentence may apportion the costs of prosecution between and among the defendants as, in its discretion, shall appear to be just and proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 285, § 61; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 61; G.L. 1909, ch. 354, § 55; P.L. 1915, ch. 1261, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 407, § 55; G.L. 1938, ch. 625, § 55; G.L. 1956, §

12-20-11

.

12-20-12.
Technology surcharge.

A technology surcharge shall be assessed as a cost against the defendant in accordance with §

8-15-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 7; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 7.